Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB73.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 8114(c), 8115(c)(2), 8122(a)(6) and (8) and (b)(1)(iv), (3) and (4) and 8130(b) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 8114. Emergency medical responders.* * *(c) Triennial registration.--An EMR's certification is deemed registered for three years after issuance. An EMR must register the EMR certification at three-year intervals by completing an application for triennial registration on a form or through an electronic process, as prescribed by the department. The following shall apply:123456789101112131415161718 (1) The department shall issue a triennial registration of an EMR certification to an EMR who meets all of the following:(i) Has a current registration and applies for a new registration no later than:(A) 30 days before the current registration is to expire; or(B) a lesser time established by regulation of the department.(ii) Successfully:(A) completes EMR triennial registration practical skills and written knowledge examinations approved by the department; or(B) secures continuing education credits for EMR triennial registration as required by the department in continuing education programs approved by the department.(2) An EMR whose registration of an EMR certification has [expired must qualify for a triennial registration of the certification as prescribed by regulation of the department.] been expired for six years or less may be recertified if the following criteria are met:(i) The EMR tests for competency or completes 16 hours of continuing education credits as determined by the department.(ii) The EMR obtains a valid certificate evidencing successful completion of a CPR course acceptable to the department.(3) The department shall certify an EMR who meets the criteria under paragraph (2).20250HB0073PN0061 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *§ 8115. Emergency medical technicians.* * *(c) Triennial registration.--An EMT's certification is deemed registered for three years after issuance. An EMT must register the EMT certification at three-year intervals by completing an application for triennial registration on a form or through an electronic process, as prescribed by the department. The following shall apply:* * *(2) An EMT whose registration of an EMT certification has [expired must qualify for a triennial registration of the certification as prescribed by regulation of the department.] been expired for six years or less may be recertified if the following criteria are met:(i) The EMT tests for competency or completes 24 hours of continuing education credits as determined by the department.(ii) The EMT obtains a valid certificate evidencing successful completion of a CPR course acceptable to the department.§ 8122. Emergency medical services vehicle operators.(a) Certification.--An EMS vehicle operator certification shall be permanent, subject to disciplinary action under this section. The department shall certify as an EMS vehicle operator a person who meets all of the following:* * *(6) Has successfully completed an emergency vehicle operator's course of instruction in person and on site, or by digital format, with a trainer approved by the department.20250HB0073PN0061 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(8) Has successfully completed an emergency vehicle operator's course of instruction in person and on site, or by digital format, with a trainer approved by the department following a disqualification from certification under paragraph (7), regardless of whether the person successfully completed the course previously.(b) Registration.--An EMS vehicle operator, other than an EMS vehicle operator who operates a vehicle exclusively for a QRS, shall register the EMS vehicle operator's certification. An EMS vehicle operator who operates an EMS vehicle exclusively for a QRS shall have no registration requirements. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an EMS vehicle operator's certification shall be deemed registered for three years after issuance. An EMS vehicle operator may not operate a ground EMS vehicle unless the certification is currently registered. The following shall apply:(1) The department shall issue a registration of an EMS vehicle operator's certification to an EMS vehicle operator who meets all of the following:* * *[(iv) Successfully completes continuing education credits for EMS vehicle operators as required by the department in continuing education programs approved by the department.]* * *[(3) If an EMS provider's certification is subject to a biennial registration cycle, the continuing education requirements for the registration of the EMS vehicle operator's certification following the initial registration 20250HB0073PN0061 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the certification shall be prorated based upon the month in which the EMS provider became certified, with any fractional requirement rounded down.(4) An EMS vehicle operator whose registration of an EMS vehicle operator's certification has expired shall qualify for a biennial registration of the certification as prescribed by regulation of the department.]* * *§ 8130. Advanced life support ambulances.* * *(b) Staffing requirements.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, minimum staffing requirements for an ALS ambulance when responding to a call to provide EMS for a patient requiring EMS above the skill level of an advanced EMT is one EMS provider at or above the EMT level[,] and one EMS provider above the advanced EMT level. [and one EMS vehicle operator. Only the two EMS providers need to respond if one of them is also the EMS vehicle operator.] When present, an EMS provider qualified to provide the type and level of EMS required by the patient must attend to the patient at the scene and during transportation. If a member of the ambulance crew arrives at the scene before another crew member, that person shall begin providing EMS to the patient at that person's skill level.(2) Minimum staffing requirements for an ALS ambulance is the same as for a BLS ambulance when the ALS ambulance responds to a call to provide EMS for a patient requiring EMS at or below the skill level of an advanced EMT.(3) When necessary and due to limited availability of 20250HB0073PN0061 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EMS resources, such as staffing during a 911 emergency call, the ALS staffing requirement under this subsection may be one EMS provider at or above the advanced EMT level and one EMS vehicle operator. The department shall provide guidance for the provision of patient care under this paragraph.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0073PN0061 - 6 - 123456